Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 2

Declarations

20-6-201. Successive actions.

Successive actions may be maintained on the same contract or transaction whenever, after the former action, a new cause of action arises therefrom.

Code 1858, § 2899; Shan., § 4620; Code 1932, § 8743; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-804.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Actions, § 26.

Law Reviews.

Actions — Splitting a Cause of Action, 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 636.

Cited: Loudenback Fertilizer Co. v. Tennessee Phosphate Co., 121 F. 298, 1903 U.S. App. LEXIS 4608, 61 L.R.A. 402 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1903).

20-6-202. Actions on bonds.

In actions upon penal bonds or other writings for the nonperformance of any covenant or agreement contained in the penal bonds or other writings, the plaintiff may assign as many breaches as the plaintiff deems proper, and verdict and judgment may be rendered for such of the breaches as the plaintiff may prove; or, if judgment is rendered for the plaintiff on demurrer or by default, a writ of inquiry of damages shall be awarded.

Code 1858, § 2898; Shan., § 4619; Code 1932, § 8742; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-805.